Alabama, session 2026rs, HB328.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 13A-7-41, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§13A-7-41
(a) A person commits the crime of arson in the first
degree if he or she intentionally damages a building by
starting or maintaining a fire or causing an explosion, while
another person is present in the building at the time, and
when either of the following occur:
(1) Another person is present in such building at the
time, and
(2)(1) The actor knows that fact, or the circumstances
are such as to render the presence of a person therein a
reasonable possibility; or
(2) The fire or explosion is started in conjunction
with or to effectuate a theft, and the fire or explosion or
accompanying theft results in damages of twenty-five thousand
dollars ($25,000) or more.
(b) Arson in the first degree is a Class A felony and
shall be punished by a term of imprisonment of not less than
20 years. The term of imprisonment shall run consecutive with
Page 1

years. The term of imprisonment shall run consecutive with
HB328 Enrolled
any other term of imprisonment for any other offense arising
out of the same facts and circumstances."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
HB328 Enrolled








________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 24-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 08-Apr-26 Passed



Page 3